src/numeral-sme-lex.txt
! Divvun & Giellatekno - open source grammars for Sámi and other languages
! Copyright © 2000-2010 The University of Tromsø & the Norwegian Sámi Parliament
! http://giellatekno.uit.no & http://divvun.no
!
! This program is free software; you can redistribute and/or modify
! this file under the terms of the GNU General Public License as published by
! the Free Software Foundation, either version 3 of the License, or
! (at your option) any later version. The GNU General Public License
! is found at http://www.gnu.org/licenses/gpl.html. It is
! also available in the file $GTHOME/LICENSE.txt.
!
! Other licensing options are available upon request, please contact
! giellatekno@hum.uit.no or divvun@samediggi.no

! ############################## !
!This file contains the numerals !
! ############################## !




! Numerals
! ========

! The initial lexica
! ------------------

LEXICON Numeral
 MILJON ;           ! a noun of its own
 UNDERDUHAT ;       ! for generator under 1000
 JUSTDUHAT ;        ! going via 1000
 OVERDUHAT ;     ! for generator over 1000
 OLD ;           ! for "thirteen hundred, etc.
num-imprecise ;
num-collective ;
 +Use/Circ: ARABIC ;          ! for the arabic numerals        !
 +Use/Circ: ROMAN ;           ! for the roman numerals         !
 +Use/Circ: NUM-PREFIXES ;    ! for §34 etc.                   !
 +Use/Circ: ISOLATED-NUMEXP ; ! for ½ etc.                     !
11TO99F ;
21TO99 ;
DUHAT ;
1TO9DUHAT ;
O-NUPPELOHKAI ;
NUPPELOHKAICUODI ;
NUPPELOHKAI ;



! We now run through the alphabetic numerals, ending up with the case
! inflection of the final number.

! Million, a noun of its own
! --------------------------

LEXICON MILJON
miljovdna+v1:miljovdna OKTA ;
miljovdna+v2:millijovdna OKTA ;
miljovdna+Use/Sub:miljuvdna OKTA ;
miljovdna+Use/Sub:milljovdna OKTA ;
miljovdna+v3+Num+Sg+Nom:miljon%> K ;                !Num or N?
miljovdna+Num+Sg+Nom+Use/Sub:miljun%> K ;                         !
miljovdna+Use/Sub:millijuvdna OKTA ;
miljovnnat+A+Ord:miljovnnag VUOSTTAS ;    ! This should NOT be N, since it is the starting point of the Ordinal
miljovnnat+A+Ord:millijovnnag VUOSTTAS ;
miljovnnat+A+Ord:miljonag VUOSTTAS ;
miljárda:miljár'da OKTA ;         !Num or N?
miljárda+Use/Sub:milliár'da OKTA ;         !Num or N?
miljárddat+A+Ord:miljárddag VUOSTTAS ;



! Overduhat, for the numerals over 1000
! --------------------------------------

LEXICON OVERDUHAT
O-OKTAF ;
O-2TO9F ;
 O-JUSTLOGIF ; ! 10000
 O-2TO9LOG ;   ! 20000, 30000, ...
 O-NUPPELOT ;  ! 11000, 12000, ...
 O-CUODI ;     ! 100000
 O-2TO9CUO ;   ! 200000, 300000, ...

! All the child lexica of OVERDUHAT have the prefix O-.
! They are directed via their respective numerals to the lexicon JUSTDUHAT.


! Thousands

LEXICON O-OKTAF
okta:okta# JUSTDUHAT ;
okta:akta# JUSTDUHAT ;
JUSTDUHAT ;
DUHAT ;


LEXICON O-2TO9F
guokte:guokte#   JUSTDUHAT ;
golbma:golbma#   JUSTDUHAT ;
njeallje:njeallje# JUSTDUHAT ;
njeallj:njeallja# JUSTDUHAT ;
vihtta:vihtta#   JUSTDUHAT ;
guhtta:guhtta#   JUSTDUHAT ;
čieža:čieža#    JUSTDUHAT ;
čieža+Use/Sub:gieža#    JUSTDUHAT ;
gávcci:gávcci#   JUSTDUHAT ;
ovcci:ovcci#    JUSTDUHAT ;

LEXICON 1TO9DUHAT
oktaduhát:ok'ta OKTADUHAT ;
guokteduhát:guok't GUOKTEDUHAT ;
nubbeduhát:nubb NUBBEDUHAT ;
golbmaduhát:golbma GOLBMADUHAT ;
njealljeduhát:njeallj GUOKTEDUHAT ;
njealljaduhát+Num+Sg+Nom:njeallja#duhát%> K ;
njealljaduhát+Num+Sg+Acc:njeallja#duhát%> K ;
njealljaduhát+Num+Sg+Gen:njealja#duhát%> K ;
njealljaduhát+Num+Sg+Acc:njeallja#duháh%>a K ;
njealljaduhát+Num+Sg+Gen:njealja#duháh%>a K ;
vihttaduhát:vi VIHTTADUHAT ;
guhttaduhát:gu VIHTTADUHAT ;
čiežaduhát:či CIEZADUHAT ;
giežaduhát:gi CIEZADUHAT ;
gávcciduhát:gák'ci GAVCCIDUHAT ;
ovcciduhát:ok'ci GAVCCIDUHAT ;



! Tens of thousands

LEXICON O-JUSTLOGIF
logi:logi# JUSTDUHAT ;
logi:logi# DUHAT ;
! This lexicon is for the number 10000 only. it is separated from the
! rest to avoid forms like *logivihttaduhát, etc.


LEXICON O-LOGIF
logi:logi# JUSTDUHAT ;
logi:logi# DUHAT ;
logiokta:logi#okta# JUSTDUHAT ;
logiakta:logi#akta# JUSTDUHAT ;
logiguokte:logi#guokte# JUSTDUHAT ;
logigolbma:logi#golbma# JUSTDUHAT ;
loginjeallje:logi#njeallje# JUSTDUHAT ;
loginjeallja:logi#njeallja# JUSTDUHAT ;
logivihtta:logi#vihtta# JUSTDUHAT ;
logiguhtta:logi#guhtta# JUSTDUHAT ;
logičieža:logi#čieža# JUSTDUHAT ;
logigieža:logi#gieža# JUSTDUHAT ;
logigávcci:logi#gávcci# JUSTDUHAT ;
logiovcci:logi#ovcci# JUSTDUHAT ;
logiokta:logi#okta# DUHAT ;
logiakta:logi#akta# DUHAT ;
logiguokte:logi#guokte# DUHAT ;
logigolbma:logi#golbma# DUHAT ;
loginjeallje:logi#njeallje# DUHAT ;
loginjeallja:logi#njeallja# DUHAT ;
logivihtta:logi#vihtta# DUHAT ;
logiguhtta:logi#guhtta# DUHAT ;
logičieža:logi#čieža# DUHAT ;
logigieža:logi#gieža# DUHAT ;
logigávcci:logi#gávcci# DUHAT ;
logiovcci:logi#ovcci# DUHAT ;


! this lexicon is accessed only via other O-lexica, and not directly
! from OVERDUHAT. Thus, *logivihttaduhát, etc. is avoided.

LEXICON O-2TO9LOG
guokte:guokte# O-LOGIF ;
golbma:golbma# O-LOGIF ;
njeallje:njeallje# O-LOGIF ;
njeallja:njeallja# O-LOGIF ;
vihtta:vihtta# O-LOGIF ;
guhtta:guhtta# O-LOGIF ;
čieža:čieža# O-LOGIF ;
gieža:gieža# O-LOGIF ;
gávcci:gávcci# O-LOGIF ;
ovcci:ovcci# O-LOGIF ;


! Teens of thousands

LEXICON O-NUPPELOT
okta:okta# O-NL ;
akta:akta# O-NL ;
guokte:guokte# O-NL ;
golbma:golbma# O-NL ;
njeallje:njeallje# O-NL ;
njeallja:njeallja# O-NL ;
vihtta:vihtta# O-NL ;
guhtta:guhtta# O-NL ;
čieža:čieža# O-NL ;
gieža:gieža# O-NL ;
gávcci:gávcci# O-NL ;
ovcci:ovcci# O-NL ;

LEXICON O-NL
nuppelohkái:nuppe#lohkái# JUSTDUHAT ;
nuppelohkái:nuppe#lohkái# DUHAT ;
nuppelot:nuppe#lot# JUSTDUHAT ;
nuppelot:nuppe#lot# DUHAT ;
goalmmátlohkái:goalmmát#lohkái# JUSTDUHAT ;
goalmmátlohkái:goalmmát#lohkái# DUHAT ;
goalmmátlot:goalmmát#lot# JUSTDUHAT ;
goalmmátlot:goalmmát#lot# DUHAT ;
njealjátlohkái:njealját#lohkái# JUSTDUHAT ;
njealjátlohkái:njealját#lohkái# DUHAT ;
njealjátlot:njealját#lot# JUSTDUHAT ;
njealjátlot:njealját#lot# DUHAT ;
viđátlohkái:viđát#lohkái# JUSTDUHAT ;
viđátlohkái:viđát#lohkái# DUHAT ;
viđátlot:viđát#lot# JUSTDUHAT ;
viđátlot:viđát#lot# DUHAT ;
guđátlohkái:guđát#lohkái# JUSTDUHAT ;
guđátlohkái:guđát#lohkái# DUHAT ;
guđátlot:guđát#lot# JUSTDUHAT ;
guđátlot:guđát#lot# DUHAT ;
viđatlohkái:viđat#lohkái# JUSTDUHAT ;
viđatlohkái:viđat#lohkái# DUHAT ;
viđatlot:viđat#lot# JUSTDUHAT ;
viđatlot:viđat#lot# DUHAT ;
guđatlohkái:guđat#lohkái# JUSTDUHAT ;
guđatlohkái:guđat#lohkái# DUHAT ;
guđatlot:guđat#lot# JUSTDUHAT ;
guđatlot:guđat#lot# DUHAT ;
čihččetlohkái:čihččet#lohkái# JUSTDUHAT ;
čihččetlohkái:čihččet#lohkái# DUHAT ;
čihččetlot:čihččet#lot# JUSTDUHAT ;
čihččetlot:čihččet#lot# DUHAT ;
gávccátlohkái:gávccát#lohkái# JUSTDUHAT ;
gávccátlohkái:gávccát#lohkái# DUHAT ;
gávccátlot:gávccát#lot# JUSTDUHAT ;
gávccátlot:gávccát#lot# DUHAT ;
ovccátlohkái:ovccát#lohkái# JUSTDUHAT ;
ovccátlohkái:ovccát#lohkái# DUHAT ;
ovccátlot:ovccát#lot# JUSTDUHAT ;
ovccátlot:ovccát#lot# DUHAT ;
logátlohkái:logát#lohkái# JUSTDUHAT ;
logátlohkái:logát#lohkái# DUHAT ;
logátlot:logát#lot# JUSTDUHAT ;
logátlot:logát#lot# DUHAT ;

LEXICON O-NUPPELOHKAI
nuppelohkái:nuppe#lohkái# DUHAT ;
nuppelot:nuppe#lot# DUHAT ;
goalmmátlohkái:goalmmát#lohkái# DUHAT ;
goalmmátlot:goalmmát#lot# DUHAT ;
njealjátlohkái:njealját#lohkái# DUHAT ;
njealjátlot:njealját#lot# DUHAT ;
viđátlohkái:viđát#lohkái# DUHAT ;
viđátlot:viđát#lot# DUHAT ;
guđátlohkái:guđát#lohkái# DUHAT ;
guđátlot:guđát#lot# DUHAT ;
viđatlohkái:viđat#lohkái# DUHAT ;
viđatlot:viđat#lot# DUHAT ;
guđatlohkái:guđat#lohkái# DUHAT ;
guđatlot:guđat#lot# DUHAT ;
čihččetlohkái:čihččet#lohkái# DUHAT ;
čihččetlot:čihččet#lot# DUHAT ;
gávccátlohkái:gávccát#lohkái# DUHAT ;
gávccátlot:gávccát#lot# DUHAT ;
ovccátlohkái:ovccát#lohkái# DUHAT ;
ovccátlot:ovccát#lot# DUHAT ;
logátlohkái:logát#lohkái# DUHAT ;
logátlot:logát#lot# DUHAT ;


! Hundreds of thousands

LEXICON O-CUODI
čuođi:čuođi# O-OKTAF ;  ! 101000
čuođi:čuođi# O-LOGIF ; ! 110000, 113000, ...
čuođi:čuođi# O-2TO9LOG ;  ! 120000, 123000, ...
čuođi:čuođi# O-NUPPELOT ; ! 115000, ...
oktačuohti:okta#čuohti# O-OKTAF ;  ! 101000
oktačuohti:okta#čuohti# O-LOGIF ; ! 110000, 113000, ...
oktačuohti:okta#čuohti# O-2TO9LOG ;  ! 120000, 123000, ...
oktačuohti:okta#čuohti# O-NUPPELOT ; ! 115000, ...
čuohte:čuohte# O-OKTAF ;
čuohti:čuohti# O-OKTAF ;  ! 101000
čuohti:čuohti# O-LOGIF ; ! 110000, 113000, ...
čuohti:čuohti# O-2TO9LOG ;  ! 120000, 123000, ...
čuohti:čuohti# O-NUPPELOT ; ! 115000, ...
